Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1035.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "advanced recycling," "advanced recycling facility," "municipal waste," "processing" and "treatment" in section 103 of the act of July 7, 1980 (P.L.380, No.97), known as the Solid Waste Management Act, are 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Advanced recycling." The term includes:(1) A manufacturing process for the conversion of post-use polymers through processes, including pyrolysis, gasification, depolymerization, catalytic cracking, reforming, hydrogenation and other similar technologies, into any of the following:[(1)] (i) Basic hydrocarbon raw materials, feedstocks, chemicals, liquid fuels, waxes and lubricants.[(2)] (ii) Other products, including, but not limited to, monomers, oligomers, plastics, crude oil, naphtha, liquid transportation fuels and other basic hydrocarbons.(2) A manufacturing process for the conversion of waste tires through mechanical shredding or pyrolysis into any of the following:(i) Pyrolytic gases and pyrolytic gas vapors to be burned directly for fuel.(ii) Pyrolysis oils.(iii) Limonene.(iv) Solid minerals or steel.(v) Recovered carbon black.(vi) Transportation fuels.20250HB1035PN1119 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vii) Transportation fuel feedstock."Advanced recycling facility." A manufacturing facility that receives post-use polymers or waste tires and separates, stores and converts the post-use polymers or waste tires using advanced recycling. The term does not include a resource recovery facility, processing facility, municipal waste processing or disposal facility or any other facility that receives unsorted municipal waste for the purpose of separating out post-use polymers or waste tires for use in advanced recycling.* * *"Municipal waste." Any garbage, refuse, industrial lunchroom or office waste and other material including solid, liquid, semisolid or contained gaseous material resulting from operation of residential, municipal, commercial or institutional establishments and from community activities and any sludge not meeting the definition of residual or hazardous waste hereunder from a municipal, commercial or institutional water supply treatment plant, waste water treatment plant, or air pollution control facility. The term does not include post-use polymers or waste tires that are converted through advanced recycling.* * *"Processing."(1) The term includes any of the following:(i) Any method or technology used for the purpose of reducing the volume or bulk of municipal or residual waste or any method or technology used to convert part or all of such waste materials for off-site reuse.(ii) Transfer facilities, composting facilities, and resource recovery facilities.(2) The term does not include any of the following:20250HB1035PN1119 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) A collection or processing center that is only for source-separated recyclable materials, including clear glass, colored glass, aluminum, steel and bimetallic cans, high-grade office paper, newsprint, corrugated paper and plastics.(ii) The conversion of post-use polymers or waste tires through advanced recycling in which the manufacturing activities, handling of the post-use polymers or waste tires at an advanced recycling facility and the products and by-products of the advanced recycling conversion comply with all applicable Environmental Protection Agency and department rules and regulations.* * *"Treatment." Any method, technique, or process, including neutralization, designed to change the physical, chemical, or biological character or composition of any waste so as to neutralize such waste or so as to render such waste nonhazardous, safer for transport, suitable for recovery, suitable for storage, or reduced in volume. Such term includes any activity or processing designed to change the physical form or chemical composition of waste so as to render it neutral or nonhazardous. The term does not include the conversion of post-use polymers or waste tires through advanced recycling in which the manufacturing activities, handling of the post-use polymers or waste tires at an advanced recycling facility and the products and by-products of the advanced recycling conversion comply with all applicable Environmental Protection Agency and department rules and regulations."Waste tire." A tire that will no longer be used for the 20250HB1035PN1119 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 purpose for which it was originally intended. The term includes a tire that has been discarded. For the purpose of this act, waste tires that are converted using advanced recycling shall not be considered solid waste, municipal waste or residual waste.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1035PN1119 - 5 - 123456